Nevada, session 83, AB160-82.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 179 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 1.3 and 1.7 of this act.
Sec. 1.3. 1. Not later than January 1, 2027, the Division
shall develop and implement a process to identify, based on data
maintained in the records of the Division, each:
(a) Conviction of a person that becomes an eligible conviction;
(b) Charge against a person that becomes an eligible charge;
and
(c) Agency of criminal justice or public or private company,
agency, officer and other custodian of records that may
reasonably be identified as having possession of records relating
to a conviction or charge that becomes an eligible conviction or
eligible charge.
2. After the development and implementation of the process
described in subsection 1, the Division shall, each month:
(a) Identify each:
(1) Conviction of a person or charge against a person that
has become an eligible conviction or eligible charge in the
immediately preceding month; and
(2) Agency of criminal justice or public or private company,
agency, officer or other custodian of records that may reasonably
be identified as having possession of records relating to an eligible
conviction or eligible charge identified pursuant to
subparagraph (1);
(b) Compile a list of each eligible conviction, eligible charge
and person or governmental entity identified pursuant to
paragraph (a); and
-
*AB160_R3*

– 5 –
(c) Transmit the list compiled pursuant to paragraph (b) to the
Administrative Office of the Courts to recommend the sealing of
records relating to an eligible conviction or eligible charge
identified on the list.
3. Not later than January 1, 2027, the Administrative Office
of the Courts shall develop and implement a process to review the
list received from the Division pursuant to paragraph (c) of
subsection 2 and transmit to every court having jurisdiction each:
(a) Conviction of a person that has become an eligible
conviction; and
(b) Charge against a person that has become an eligible
charge.
4. Upon receiving a list transmitted by the Division pursuant
to paragraph (c) of subsection 2, the Administrative Office of the
Courts shall confirm each eligible conviction and eligible charge
and, not later than 30 business days after receiving the list from
the Division, notify every court having jurisdiction over the sealing
of records relating to each confirmed eligible conviction and
eligible charge to order the sealing of such records.
5. A court that receives notification from the Administrative
Office of the Courts pursuant to subsection 4 shall, not later than
15 calendar days after receiving such notification, provide notice
to the appropriate prosecuting attorney or agency. The
prosecuting attorney or agency may object to the sealing of such
records not later than 30 calendar days after receiving notice from
the court.
6. If, not later than 30 calendar days after receiving notice
from the court pursuant to subsection 5, a prosecuting attorney or
agency:
(a) Stipulates to the sealing of the records, the court shall
apply the presumption set forth in NRS 179.2445 and order the
sealing of the records.
(b) Does not stipulate to the sealing of the records, the court
shall apply the presumption set forth in NRS 179.2445 and order
the sealing of the records without a hearing. Each person or
governmental entity identified on the list as having possession of
records relating to an eligible conviction or eligible charge to
which the order applies must be named in the order.
(c) Objects to the sealing of the records, the court may conduct
a hearing on the matter. At the hearing, unless an objecting party
presents evidence sufficient to rebut the presumption set forth in
NRS 179.2445, the court shall apply the presumption and order
the sealing of the records.
7. The Division and the Administrative Office of the Courts
shall take such actions as are necessary to ensure public
-
*AB160_R3*

– 6 –
awareness of the provisions of this section. Such actions may
include, without limitation, the posting of appropriate information
on an Internet website maintained by the Division or the
Administrative Office of the Courts or the conducting of a public
awareness campaign.
8. The Division and the Administrative Office of the Courts
may adopt any rules or regulations, as applicable, that are
necessary to carry out the provisions of this section, including,
without limitation, rules or regulations concerning:
(a) Contracting with any vendors to update any necessary
technology; and
(b) Applying for any grants available to carry out the
provisions of this section.
9. The provisions of this section do not prohibit a person from
petitioning the court for the sealing of any eligible records in
accordance with any other applicable provision of law.
10. If a person believes that his or her records have been
sealed, the person may make a written request to the appropriate
court to confirm that his or her records have been sealed and
review such records.
11. On or before January 31, 2028, and each year thereafter,
the Administrative Office of the Courts shall submit a report to the
Director of the Legislative Counsel Bureau for transmittal to
Legislature that sets forth, to the extent possible, the number of
records that were identified to be eligible for sealing and the
number of records that were ordered to be sealed during the
previous calendar year.
12. As used in this section:
(a) “Division” means the Records, Communications and
Compliance Division of the Department of Public Safety.
(b) “Eligible charge” means any charge against a person on or
after January 1, 2027, if the records relating to the charge are
eligible to be sealed pursuant to subsection 1 of NRS 179.255 for a
drug-related charge that is punishable as a category E felony or a
misdemeanor, including, without limitation, a charge pursuant to
paragraph (a) of subsection 2 of NRS 453.336, subsection 4 or 5 of
NRS 453.336, subsection 2 of NRS 453.3393 or NRS 453.560 or
454.351.
(c) “Eligible conviction” means any conviction of a person on
or after January 1, 2027, if the records relating to the conviction
are eligible to be sealed pursuant to paragraph (c) or (g) of
subsection 1 of NRS 179.245 for a drug-related conviction,
including, without limitation, a conviction pursuant to paragraph
(a) of subsection 2 of NRS 453.336, subsection 4 or 5 of NRS
453.336, subsection 2 of NRS 453.3393 or NRS 453.560 or
-
*AB160_R3*

– 7 –
454.351, and the person has not been, in the time period
prescribed in the applicable provision, charged with any offense
for which the charges are pending or convicted of any offense,
except for minor moving or standing traffic violations.
Sec. 1.7. 1. The Advisory Task Force on Automatic Record
Sealing is hereby created. The Task Force consists of:
(a) Fifteen members appointed by the Legislative Commission
from recommendations submitted by the applicable participating
entities consisting of:
(1) One member who is a representative of the
Administrative Office of the Courts;
(2) One member who is a representative of the Nevada
Supreme Court or his or her designee;
(3) One member who is a representative of a district court;
(4) One member who is a representative of a justice court;
(5) One member who is a representative of a municipal
court;
(6) One member who is a representative of a district
attorney’s office;
(7) One member who is a representative of the Office of the
Attorney General;
(8) One member who is a representative of the Office of the
Clark County Public Defender or the Office of the Washoe County
Public Defender or who is an attorney in private practice and
experienced in defending criminal actions;
(9) One member who is a representative of an urban law
enforcement agency;
(10) One member who is a representative of a rural law
enforcement agency;
(11) One member who is a representative of the Division of
Parole and Probation of the Department of Public Safety;
(12) One member who is a representative of the Department
of Corrections;
(13) One member who is a representative of the Records,
Communications and Compliance Division of the Department of
Public Safety; and
(14) Two members who are representatives from nonprofit
organizations focused on issues relating to criminal justice;
(b) One member of the Senate who is appointed by the
Majority Leader of the Senate; and
(c) One member of the Assembly who is appointed by the
Speaker of the Assembly.
2. When appointing members to the Task Force pursuant to
paragraph (a) of subsection 1, the Legislative Commission shall
ensure that all regions of this State are represented.
-
*AB160_R3*

– 8 –
3. At the first meeting of the Task Force, the members shall
elect a Chair and Vice Chair by a majority vote.
4. The Department of Public Safety shall provide the Task
Force with such staff as is necessary for the Task Force to carry
out its duties pursuant to this section.
5. The members of the Task Force serve without
compensation or per diem allowance. If sufficient money is
available, a member of the Task Force may, upon written request,
receive reimbursement for travel expenses provided for state
officers and employees generally while engaged in the business of
the Task Force.
6. The Task Force:
(a) Shall:
(1) Review the current petition-based process for the
sealing of records and identify the ways in which the process can
be streamlined to simplify the process for petitioners;
(2) Conduct research on methods to implement the
provisions of section 1.3 of this act, including, without limitation,
necessary technology and system upgrades within the criminal
justice system of this State;
(3) Identify and assess any technology and system gaps,
necessary infrastructure and policy constraints to support the
implementation of the automatic sealing of records;
(4) Develop a timeline for implementation that includes
benchmarks to implement the provisions of section 1.3 of this act;
and
(5) Recommend approaches to improve the ability of this
State to expand future provisions concerning the automatic
sealing of records, including, without limitation, the feasibility of
retroactively sealing eligible charges and convictions; and
(b) May consider, in its discretion, any other matters submitted
by a member of the Task Force.
7. The Department of Public Safety may:
(a) Enter into a contract with a consultant or vendor to
perform the research necessary for the Task Force to carry out its
duties; and
(b) Apply for and accept any gift, donation, bequest, grant or
other source of money to assist the Task Force in carrying out its
duties.
8. The Task Force shall:
(a) On or before July 1, 2024, prepare and submit a report to
the Administrative Office of the Courts and the Director of the
Legislative Counsel Bureau, for transmittal to the Legislature, that
sets forth the initial activities and findings of the Task Force,
-
*AB160_R3*

– 9 –
including, without limitation, the ways in which the petition-based
process for the sealing of records can be streamlined;
(b) On or before July 1, 2025, prepare and submit a report to
the Administrative Office of the Courts and the Director of the
Legislative Counsel Bureau, for transmittal to the Legislature, that
sets forth the activities, findings and initial recommendations of
the Task Force; and
(c) On or before July 1, 2026, prepare and submit a report to
the Administrative Office of the Courts and the Director of the
Legislative Counsel Bureau, for transmittal to the Legislature, that
sets forth the final activities, findings and recommendations of the
Task Force to support the implementation of the automatic sealing
of records.
9. The meetings of the Task Force are closed to the public
and are not subject to the provisions of chapter 241 of NRS.
Sec. 2. NRS 179.2405 is hereby amended to read as follows:
179.2405 The Legislature hereby declares that the public
policy of this State is to [favor] :
1. Favor the giving of second chances to offenders who are
rehabilitated and the sealing of the records of such persons in
accordance with NRS 179.2405 to 179.301, inclusive [.] , and
section 1.7 of this act; and
2. Enhance and modernize the sharing of information
between agencies of criminal justice by having records shared in a
timely manner in accordance with statutory requirements.
Sec. 2.3. NRS 179.2405 is hereby amended to read as follows:
179.2405 The Legislature hereby declares that the public
policy of this State is to:
1. Favor the giving of second chances to offenders who are
rehabilitated and the sealing of the records of such persons in
accordance with NRS 179.2405 to 179.301, inclusive, and [section]
sections 1.3 and 1.7 of this act; and
2. Enhance and modernize the sharing of information between
agencies of criminal justice by having records shared in a timely
manner in accordance with statutory requirements.
Sec. 2.7. NRS 179.2405 is hereby amended to read as follows:
179.2405 The Legislature hereby declares that the public
policy of this State is to:
1. Favor the giving of second chances to offenders who are
rehabilitated and the sealing of the records of such persons in
accordance with NRS 179.2405 to 179.301, inclusive, and [sections]
section 1.3 [and 1.7] of this act; and
2. Enhance and modernize the sharing of information between
agencies of criminal justice by having records shared in a timely
manner in accordance with statutory requirements.
-
*AB160_R3*

– 10 –
Sec. 3. NRS 179.241 is hereby amended to read as follows:
179.241 As used in NRS 179.2405 to 179.301, inclusive, and
section 1.7 of this act, unless the context otherwise requires, the
words and terms defined in NRS 179.242, 179.243 and 179.244
have the meanings ascribed to them in those sections.
Sec. 3.1. NRS 179.241 is hereby amended to read as follows:
179.241 As used in NRS 179.2405 to 179.301, inclusive, and
[section] sections 1.3 and 1.7 of this act, unless the context
otherwise requires, the words and terms defined in NRS 179.242,
179.243 and 179.244 have the meanings ascribed to them in those
sections.
Sec. 3.3. NRS 179.241 is hereby amended to read as follows:
179.241 As used in NRS 179.2405 to 179.301, inclusive, and
[sections] section 1.3 [and 1.7] of this act, unless the context
otherwise requires, the words and terms defined in NRS 179.242,
179.243 and 179.244 have the meanings ascribed to them in those
sections.
Sec. 3.5. NRS 179.2445 is hereby amended to read as follows:
179.2445 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2,
upon the [filing] :
(a) Filing of a petition for the sealing of records pursuant to
NRS 179.245, 179.247, 179.255, 179.259 or 179.2595, there is a
rebuttable presumption that the records should be sealed if the
applicant satisfies all statutory requirements for the sealing of the
records.
(b) Receipt by a court of the list of confirmed eligible
convictions or eligible charges from the Administrative Office of
the Courts pursuant to section 1.3 of this act, there is a rebuttable
presumption that the records relating to the confirmed eligible
convictions or eligible charges should be sealed.
2. The presumption set forth in paragraph (a) of subsection 1
does not apply to a defendant who is given a dishonorable discharge
from probation pursuant to NRS 176A.850 and applies to the court
for the sealing of records relating to the conviction.
Sec. 3.7. NRS 179.245 is hereby amended to read as follows:
179.245 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 6 and
NRS 176.211, 176A.245, 176A.265, 176A.295, 179.247, 179.259,
201.354 and 453.3365, a person may petition the court in which the
person was convicted for the sealing of all records relating to a
conviction of:
(a) A category A felony, a crime of violence or residential
burglary pursuant to NRS 205.060 after 10 years from the date of
release from actual custody or discharge from parole or probation,
whichever occurs later;
-
*AB160_R3*

– 11 –
(b) Except as otherwise provided in paragraphs (a) and (e), a
category B, C or D felony after 5 years from the date of release from
actual custody or discharge from parole or probation, whichever
occurs later;
(c) A category E felony after 2 years from the date of release
from actual custody or discharge from parole or probation,
whichever occurs later;
(d) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (e), any gross
misdemeanor after 2 years from the date of release from actual
custody or discharge from probation, whichever occurs later;
(e) A violation of NRS 422.540 to 422.570, inclusive, a
violation of NRS 484C.110 or 484C.120 other than a felony, or a
battery which constitutes domestic violence pursuant to NRS 33.018
other than a felony, after 7 years from the date of release from actual
custody or from the date when the person is no longer under a
suspended sentence, whichever occurs later;
(f) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (e), if the offense
is punished as a misdemeanor, a battery pursuant to NRS 200.481,
harassment pursuant to NRS 200.571, stalking pursuant to NRS
200.575 or a violation of a temporary or extended order for
protection, after 2 years from the date of release from actual custody
or from the date when the person is no longer under a suspended
sentence, whichever occurs later; or
(g) Any other misdemeanor after 1 year from the date of release
from actual custody or from the date when the person is no longer
under a suspended sentence, whichever occurs later.
2. A petition filed pursuant to subsection 1 must:
(a) Be accompanied by the petitioner’s current, verified records
received from the Central Repository for Nevada Records of
Criminal History;
(b) If the petition references NRS 453.3365, include a certificate
of acknowledgment or the disposition of the proceedings for the
records to be sealed from all agencies of criminal justice which
maintain such records;
(c) Include a list of any other public or private agency, company,
official or other custodian of records that is reasonably known to the
petitioner to have possession of records of the conviction and to
whom the order to seal records, if issued, will be directed; and
(d) Include information that, to the best knowledge and belief of
the petitioner, accurately and completely identifies the records to be
sealed, including, without limitation, the:
(1) Date of birth of the petitioner;
(2) Specific conviction to which the records to be sealed
pertain; and
-
*AB160_R3*

– 12 –
(3) Date of arrest relating to the specific conviction to which
the records to be sealed pertain.
3. Upon receiving a petition pursuant to this section, the court
shall notify the law enforcement agency that arrested the petitioner
for the crime and the prosecuting attorney, including, without
limitation, the Attorney General, who prosecuted the petitioner for
the crime. The prosecuting attorney and any person having relevant
evidence may testify and present evidence at any hearing on the
petition.
4. If the prosecuting agency that prosecuted the petitioner for
the crime stipulates to the sealing of the records, the court shall
apply the presumption set forth in paragraph (a) of subsection 1 of
NRS 179.2445 and seal the records. If the prosecuting agency does
not stipulate to the sealing of the records or does not file a written
objection within 30 days after receiving notification pursuant to
subsection 3 and the court makes the findings set forth in subsection
5, the court may order the sealing of the records in accordance with
subsection 5 without a hearing. If the court does not order the
sealing of the records or the prosecuting agency files a written
objection, a hearing on the petition must be conducted. At the
hearing, unless an objecting party presents evidence sufficient to
rebut the presumption set forth in paragraph (a) of subsection 1 of
NRS 179.2445, the court shall apply the presumption and seal the
records.
5. If the court finds that, in the period prescribed in subsection
1, the petitioner has not been charged with any offense for which the
charges are pending or convicted of any offense, except for minor
moving or standing traffic violations, the court may order sealed all
records of the conviction which are in the custody of any agency of
criminal justice or any public or private agency, company, official
or other custodian of records in the State of Nevada, and may also
order all such records of the petitioner returned to the file of the
court where the proceeding was commenced from, including,
without limitation, the Federal Bureau of Investigation and all other
agencies of criminal justice which maintain such records and which
are reasonably known by either the petitioner or the court to have
possession of such records.
6. A person may not petition the court to seal records relating
to a conviction of:
(a) A crime against a child;
(b) A sexual offense;
(c) Invasion of the home with a deadly weapon pursuant to
NRS 205.067;
-
*AB160_R3*

– 13 –
(d) A violation of NRS 484C.110 or 484C.120 that is punishable
as a felony pursuant to paragraph (c) of subsection 1 of
NRS 484C.400;
(e) A violation of NRS 484C.430;
(f) A homicide resulting from driving or being in actual physical
control of a vehicle while under the influence of intoxicating liquor
or a controlled substance or resulting from any other conduct
prohibited by NRS 484C.110, 484C.130 or 484C.430;
(g) A violation of NRS 488.410 that is punishable as a felony
pursuant to NRS 488.427; or
(h) A violation of NRS 488.420 or 488.425.
7. The provisions of paragraph (e) of subsection 1 and
paragraph (d) of subsection 6 must not be construed to preclude a
person from being able to petition the court to seal records relating
to a conviction for a violation of NRS 484C.110 or 484C.120
pursuant to this section if the person was found guilty of a violation
of NRS 484C.110 or 484C.120 that is punishable pursuant to:
(a) Paragraph (b) of subsection 1 of NRS 484C.400; or
(b) Paragraph (c) of subsection 1 of NRS 484C.400 but had a
judgment of conviction entered against him or her for a violation of
paragraph (b) of subsection 1 of NRS 484C.400 because the person
participated in the statewide sobriety and drug monitoring program
established pursuant to NRS 484C.392.
8. If the court grants a petition for the sealing of records
pursuant to this section, upon the request of the person whose
records are sealed, the court may order sealed all records of the civil
proceeding in which the records were sealed.
9. As used in this section:
(a) “Crime against a child” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 179D.0357.
(b) “Sexual offense” means:
(1) Murder of the first degree committed in the perpetration
or attempted perpetration of sexual assault or of sexual abuse or
sexual molestation of a child less than 14 years of age pursuant to
paragraph (b) of subsection 1 of NRS 200.030.
(2) Sexual assault pursuant to NRS 200.366.
(3) Statutory sexual seduction pursuant to NRS 200.368, if
punishable as a felony.
(4) Battery with intent to commit sexual assault pursuant to
NRS 200.400.
(5) An offense involving the administration of a drug to
another person with the intent to enable or assist the commission of
a felony pursuant to NRS 200.405, if the felony is an offense listed
in this paragraph.
-
*AB160_R3*

– 14 –
(6) An offense involving the administration of a controlled
substance to another person with the intent to enable or assist the
commission of a crime of violence, if the crime of violence is an
offense listed in this paragraph.
(7) Abuse of a child pursuant to NRS 200.508, if the abuse
involved sexual abuse or sexual exploitation.
(8) An offense involving pornography and a minor pursuant
to NRS 200.710 to 200.730, inclusive.
(9) Incest pursuant to NRS 201.180.
(10) Open or gross lewdness pursuant to NRS 201.210, if
punishable as a felony.
(11) Indecent or obscene exposure pursuant to NRS 201.220,
if punishable as a felony.
(12) Lewdness with a child pursuant to NRS 201.230.
(13) Sexual penetration of a dead human body pursuant to
NRS 201.450.
(14) Sexual conduct between certain employees of a school
or volunteers at a school and a pupil pursuant to NRS 201.540.
(15) Sexual conduct between certain employees of a college
or university and a student pursuant to NRS 201.550.
(16) Luring a child or a person with mental illness pursuant
to NRS 201.560, if punishable as a felony.
(17) An attempt to commit an offense listed in this
paragraph.
Sec. 3.9. NRS 179.247 is hereby amended to read as follows:
179.247 1. If a person has been convicted of any offense
listed in subsection 2, the person may petition the court in which he
or she was convicted or, if the person wishes to file more than one
petition and would otherwise need to file a petition in more than one
court, the district court, for an order:
(a) Vacating the judgment; and
(b) Sealing all documents, papers and exhibits in the person’s
record, minute book entries and entries on dockets, and other
documents relating to the case in the custody of such other agencies
and officers as are named in the court’s order.
2. A person may file a petition pursuant to subsection 1 if the
person was convicted of:
(a) A violation of NRS 201.353 or 201.354, for engaging in
prostitution or solicitation for prostitution, provided that the person
was not alleged to be a customer of a prostitute;
(b) A crime under the laws of this State, other than a crime of
violence; or
(c) A violation of a county, city or town ordinance, for loitering
for the purpose of solicitation or prostitution.
-
*AB160_R3*

– 15 –
3. A petition filed pursuant to subsection 1 must satisfy the
requirements of NRS 179.245.
4. The court may grant a petition filed pursuant to subsection 1
if:
(a) The petitioner was convicted of a violation of an offense
described in subsection 2;
(b) The participation of the petitioner in the offense was the
result of the petitioner having been a victim of:
(1) Trafficking in persons as described in the Trafficking
Victims Protection Act of 2000, 22 U.S.C. §§ 7101 et seq.; or
(2) Involuntary servitude as described in NRS 200.463 or
200.4631; and
(c) The petitioner files a petition pursuant to subsection 1 with
due diligence after the petitioner has ceased being a victim of
trafficking or involuntary servitude or has sought services for
victims of such trafficking or involuntary servitude.
5. Before the court decides whether to grant a petition filed
pursuant to subsection 1, the court shall:
(a) Notify the Central Repository for Nevada Records of
Criminal History, the Office of the Attorney General and each office
of the district attorney and law enforcement agency in the county in
which the petitioner was convicted and allow the prosecuting
attorney who prosecuted the petitioner for the crime and any person
to testify and present evidence on behalf of any such entity; and
(b) Take into consideration any reasonable concerns for the
safety of the defendant, family members of the defendant or other
victims that may be jeopardized by the granting of the petition.
6. If the prosecuting agency that prosecuted the petitioner for
the crime stipulates to vacating the judgment of the petitioner and
sealing all documents, papers and exhibits related to the case, the
court shall apply the presumption set forth in paragraph (a) of
subsection 1 of NRS 179.2445, vacate the judgment and seal all
documents, papers and exhibits related to the case. If the
prosecuting agency does not stipulate to vacating the judgment of
the petitioner and sealing all documents, papers and exhibits related
to the case or does not file a written objection within 30 days after
receiving notification pursuant to subsection 5 and the court makes
the findings set forth in subsection 4, the court may vacate the
judgment and seal all documents, papers and exhibits in accordance
with subsection 7 without a hearing. If the court does not order the
sealing of the records or the prosecuting agency files a written
objection, a hearing on the petition must be conducted. At the
hearing, unless an objecting party presents evidence sufficient to
rebut the presumption set forth in paragraph (a) of subsection 1 of
NRS 179.2445, the court shall vacate the judgment, apply the
-
*AB160_R3*

– 16 –
presumption and seal all documents, papers and exhibits related to
the case.
7. If the court grants a petition filed pursuant to subsection 1,
the court shall:
(a) Vacate the judgment and dismiss the accusatory pleading;
and
(b) Order sealed all documents, papers and exhibits in the
petitioner’s record, minute book entries and entries on dockets, and
other documents relating to the case in the custody of such other
agencies and officers as are named in the court’s order.
8. If a petition filed pursuant to subsection 1 does not satisfy
the requirements of NRS 179.245 or the court determines that
the petition is otherwise deficient with respect to the sealing of the
petitioner’s record, the court may enter an order to vacate the
judgment and dismiss the accusatory pleading if the petitioner
satisfies all requirements necessary for the judgment to be vacated.
9. If the court enters an order pursuant to subsection 8, the
court shall also order sealed the records of the petitioner which
relate to the judgment being vacated in accordance with paragraph
(b) of subsection 7, regardless of whether any records relating to
other convictions are ineligible for sealing either by operation of law
or because of a deficiency in the petition.
Sec. 4. NRS 179.255 is hereby amended to read as follows:
179.255 1. If a person has been arrested for alleged criminal
conduct and the charges are dismissed, the prosecuting attorney
having jurisdiction declined prosecution of the charges or such
person is acquitted of the charges, the person may petition:
(a) The court in which the charges were dismissed, at any time
after the date the charges were dismissed;
(b) The court having jurisdiction in which the charges were
declined for prosecution:
(1) Any time after the applicable statute of limitations has
run;
(2) Any time 8 years after the arrest; or
(3) Pursuant to a stipulation between the parties; or
(c) The court in which the acquittal was entered, at any time
after the date of the acquittal,
 for the sealing of all records relating to the arrest and the
proceedings leading to the dismissal, declination or acquittal. If a
person has been arrested for alleged criminal conduct and
multiple charges were brought against the person, consisting of
both charges for which the person was convicted and charges
which were disposed of by dismissal, declination or acquittal, a
petition filed pursuant to this subsection may request the sealing
of those portions of the records relating to the arrest and the
-
*AB160_R3*

– 17 –
subsequent proceedings that relate to the charges which were
disposed of by dismissal, declination or acquittal.
2. If the conviction of a person is set aside pursuant to NRS
458A.240, the person may petition the court that set aside the
conviction, at any time after the conviction has been set aside, for
the sealing of all records relating to the setting aside of the
conviction.
3. A petition filed pursuant to subsection 1 or 2 must:
(a) Be accompanied by the petitioner’s current, verified records
received from the Central Repository for Nevada Records of
Criminal History;
(b) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (c), include the
disposition of the proceedings for the records to be sealed;
(c) If the petition references NRS 453.3365, include a certificate
of acknowledgment or the disposition of the proceedings for the
records to be sealed from all agencies of criminal justice which
maintain such records;
(d) Include a list of any other public or private agency,
company, official and other custodian of records that is reasonably
known to the petitioner to have possession of records of the arrest
and of the proceedings leading to the dismissal, declination or
acquittal and to whom the order to seal records, if issued, will be
directed; and
(e) Include information that, to the best knowledge and belief of
the petitioner, accurately and completely identifies the records to be
sealed, including, without limitation, the:
(1) Date of birth of the petitioner;
(2) Specific charges that were dismissed or of which the
petitioner was acquitted; and
(3) Date of arrest relating to the specific charges that were
dismissed or of which the petitioner was acquitted.
4. Upon receiving a petition pursuant to subsection 1, the court
shall notify the law enforcement agency that arrested the petitioner
for the crime and:
(a) If the charges were dismissed, declined for prosecution or the
acquittal was entered in a district court or justice court, the
prosecuting attorney for the county; or
(b) If the charges were dismissed, declined for prosecution or
the acquittal was entered in a municipal court, the prosecuting
attorney for the city.
 The prosecuting attorney and any person having relevant
evidence may testify and present evidence at any hearing on the
petition.
5. Upon receiving a petition pursuant to subsection 2, the court
shall notify:
-
*AB160_R3*

– 18 –
(a) If the conviction was set aside in a district court or justice
court, the prosecuting attorney for the county; or
(b) If the conviction was set aside in a municipal court, the
prosecuting attorney for the city.
 The prosecuting attorney and any person having relevant
evidence may testify and present evidence at any hearing on the
petition.
6. If the prosecuting agency that prosecuted or declined to
prosecute the petitioner for the crime stipulates to the sealing of the
records, the court shall apply the presumption set forth in paragraph
(a) of subsection 1 of NRS 179.2445 and seal the records. If the
prosecuting agency does not stipulate to the sealing of the records or
does not file a written objection within 30 days after receiving
notification pursuant to subsection 4 or 5 and the court makes the
findings set forth in subsection 7 or 8, as applicable, the court may
order the sealing of the records in accordance with subsection 7 or 8,
as applicable, without a hearing. If the court does not order the
sealing of the records or the prosecuting agency files a written
objection, a hearing on the petition must be conducted. At the
hearing, unless an objecting party presents evidence sufficient to
rebut the presumption set forth in paragraph (a) of subsection 1 of
NRS 179.2445, the court shall apply the presumption and seal the
records.
7. If the court finds:
(a) That there has been an acquittal and there is no evidence that
further action will be brought against the person, the court shall
order sealed all records of the arrest and of the proceedings leading
to the acquittal which are in the custody of any agency of criminal
justice or any public or private company, agency, official or other
custodian of records in the State of Nevada; or
(b) That prosecution was declined or that the charges were
dismissed and there is no evidence that further action will be
brought against the person, the court may order sealed all records of
the arrest and of the proceedings leading to the declination or
dismissal which are in the custody of any agency of criminal justice
or any public or private company, agency, official or other custodian
of records in the State of Nevada.
8. If the court finds that the conviction of the petitioner was set
aside pursuant to NRS 458A.240, the court may order sealed all
records relating to the setting aside of the conviction which are in
the custody of any agency of criminal justice or any public or
private company, agency, official or other custodian of records in
the State of Nevada.
9. If the prosecuting attorney having jurisdiction previously
declined prosecution of the charges and the records of the arrest
-
*AB160_R3*

– 19 –
have been sealed pursuant to subsection 7, the prosecuting attorney
may subsequently file the charges at any time before the running of
the statute of limitations for those charges. If such charges are filed
with the court, the court shall order the inspection of the records
without the prosecuting attorney having to petition the court
pursuant to NRS 179.295.
Sec. 5. NRS 179.275 is hereby amended to read as follows:
179.275 Where the court orders the sealing of a record
pursuant to NRS 34.970, 41.910, 174.034, 176.211, 176A.245,
176A.265, 176A.295, 179.245, 179.247, 179.255, 179.259,
179.2595, 179.271, 201.354 or 453.3365 [,] or section 1.3 of this
act, a copy of the order must be sent to:
1. The Central Repository for Nevada Records of Criminal
History; and
2. Each agency of criminal justice and each public or private
company, agency, official or other custodian of records named in
the order, and that person shall seal the records in his or her custody
which relate to the matters contained in the order, shall advise the
court of compliance and shall then seal the order.
Sec. 6. NRS 179.285 is hereby amended to read as follows:
179.285 Except as otherwise provided in NRS 179.301:
1. If the court orders a record sealed pursuant to NRS 34.970,
41.910, 174.034, 176.211, 176A.245, 176A.265, 176A.295,
179.245, 179.247, 179.255, 179.259, 179.2595, 179.271, 201.354 or
453.3365:
(a) All proceedings recounted in the record are deemed never to
have occurred, and the person to whom the order pertains may
properly answer accordingly to any inquiry, including, without
limitation, an inquiry relating to an application for employment,
concerning the arrest, conviction, dismissal or acquittal and the
events and proceedings relating to the arrest, conviction, dismissal
or acquittal.
(b) The person is immediately restored to the following civil
rights if the person’s civil rights previously have not been restored:
(1) The right to vote;
(2) The right to hold office; and
(3) The right to serve on a jury.
2. Upon the sealing of the person’s records, a person who is
restored to his or her civil rights pursuant to subsection 1 must be
given:
(a) An official document which demonstrates that the person has
been restored to the civil rights set forth in paragraph (b) of
subsection 1; and
(b) A written notice informing the person that he or she has not
been restored to the right to bear arms, unless the person has
-
*AB160_R3*

– 20 –
received a pardon and the pardon does not restrict his or her right to
bear arms.
3. [A] If a person [who] has had his or her records sealed in
this State or any other state and [whose] was not given official
documentation of the restoration of civil rights or if that
documentation is lost, damaged or destroyed , the person may file a
written request with a court of competent jurisdiction to restore his
or her civil rights pursuant to this section. Upon verification that the
person has had his or her records sealed, the court shall issue an
order restoring the person to the civil rights to vote, to hold office
and to serve on a jury. A person must not be required to pay a fee to
receive such an order.
4. A person who has had his or her records sealed in this State
or any other state may present official documentation that the person
has been restored to his or her civil rights or a court order restoring
civil rights as proof that the person has been restored to the right to
vote, to hold office and to serve as a juror.
Sec. 6.5. NRS 179.285 is hereby amended to read as follows:
179.285 Except as otherwise provided in NRS 179.301:
1. If the court orders a record sealed pursuant to NRS 34.970,
41.910, 174.034, 176.211, 176A.245, 176A.265, 176A.295,
179.245, 179.247, 179.255, 179.259, 179.2595, 179.271, 201.354 or
453.3365 [:] or section 1.3 of this act:
(a) All proceedings recounted in the record are deemed never to
have occurred, and the person to whom the order pertains may
properly answer accordingly to any inquiry, including, without
limitation, an inquiry relating to an application for employment,
concerning the arrest, conviction, dismissal or acquittal and the
events and proceedings relating to the arrest, conviction, dismissal
or acquittal.
(b) The person is immediately restored to the following civil
rights if the person’s civil rights previously have not been restored:
(1) The right to vote;
(2) The right to hold office; and
(3) The right to serve on a jury.
2. Upon the sealing of the person’s records, except if the
person’s records were sealed pursuant to section 1.3 of this act, a
person who is restored to his or her civil rights pursuant to
subsection 1 must be given:
(a) An official document which demonstrates that the person has
been restored to the civil rights set forth in paragraph (b) of
subsection 1; and
(b) A written notice informing the person that he or she has not
been restored to the right to bear arms, unless the person has
-
*AB160_R3*

– 21 –
received a pardon and the pardon does not restrict his or her right to
bear arms.
3. If a person has had his or her records sealed in this State or
any other state and was not given official documentation of the
restoration of civil rights or if that documentation is lost, damaged
or destroyed, the person may file a written request with a court of
competent jurisdiction to restore his or her civil rights pursuant to
this section. Upon verification that the person has had his or her
records sealed, the court shall issue an order restoring the person to
the civil rights to vote, to hold office and to serve on a jury. A
person must not be required to pay a fee to receive such an order.
4. A person who has had his or her records sealed in this State
or any other state may present official documentation that the person
has been restored to his or her civil rights or a court order restoring
civil rights as proof that the person has been restored to the right to
vote, to hold office and to serve as a juror.
Sec. 7. NRS 179.295 is hereby amended to read as follows:
179.295 1. The person who is the subject of the records that
are sealed pursuant to NRS 34.970, 41.910, 174.034, 176.211,
176A.245, 176A.265, 176A.295, 179.245, 179.247, 179.255,
179.259, 179.2595, 179.271, 201.354 or 453.3365 or section 1.3 of
this act may petition the court that ordered the records sealed to
permit inspection of the records by a person named in the petition,
and the court may order such inspection. Except as otherwise
provided in this section, subsection 9 of NRS 179.255 and NRS
179.259 and 179.301, the court may not order the inspection of the
records under any other circumstances.
2. If a person has been arrested, the charges have been
dismissed and the records of the arrest have been sealed, the court
may order the inspection of the records by a prosecuting attorney
upon a showing that as a result of newly discovered evidence, the
person has been arrested for the same or a similar offense and that
there is sufficient evidence reasonably to conclude that the person
will stand trial for the offense.
3. The court may, upon the application of a prosecuting
attorney or an attorney representing a defendant in a criminal action,
order an inspection of such records for the purpose of obtaining
information relating to persons who were involved in the incident
recorded.
4. This section does not prohibit a court from considering a
proceeding for which records have been sealed pursuant to NRS
174.034, 176.211, 176A.245, 176A.265, 176A.295, 179.245,
179.247, 179.255, 179.259, 179.2595, 179.271, 201.354 or
453.3365 or section 1.3 of this act in determining whether to grant a
petition pursuant to NRS 176.211, 176A.245, 176A.265, 176A.295,
-
*AB160_R3*

– 22 –
179.245, 179.255, 179.259, 179.2595 or 453.3365 for a conviction
of another offense.
Sec. 7.5. NRS 179.301 is hereby amended to read as follows:
179.301 1. The Nevada Gaming Control Board and the
Nevada Gaming Commission and their employees, agents and
representatives may inquire into and inspect any records sealed
pursuant to NRS 179.245 or 179.255, if the event or conviction was
related to gaming, to determine the suitability or qualifications of
any person to hold a state gaming license, manufacturer’s, seller’s or
distributor’s license or registration as a gaming employee pursuant
to chapter 463 of NRS. Events and convictions, if any, which are the
subject of an order sealing records:
(a) May form the basis for recommendation, denial or
revocation of those licenses.
(b) Must not form the basis for denial or rejection of a gaming
work permit unless the event or conviction relates to the applicant’s
suitability or qualifications to hold the work permit.
2. The Division of Insurance of the Department of Business
and Industry and its employees may inquire into and inspect any
records sealed pursuant to NRS 179.245 or 179.255, if the event
or conviction was related to insurance, to determine the suitability or
qualifications of any person to hold a license, certification or
authorization issued in accordance with title 57 of NRS. Events and
convictions, if any, which are the subject of an order sealing records
may form the basis for recommendation, denial or revocation of
those licenses, certifications and authorizations.
3. A prosecuting attorney may inquire into and inspect any
records sealed pursuant to NRS 179.245 or 179.255 if:
(a) The records relate to a violation or alleged violation of NRS
202.485; and
(b) The person who is the subject of the records has been
arrested or issued a citation for violating NRS 202.485.
4. The Central Repository for Nevada Records of Criminal
History and its employees may inquire into and inspect any records
sealed pursuant to NRS 179.245 or 179.255 that constitute
information relating to [sexual] :
(a) Sexual offenses, and may notify employers of the
information in accordance with federal laws and regulations.
(b) A violation or alleged violation of NRS 202.360.
5. Records which have been sealed pursuant to NRS 179.245
or 179.255 and which are retained in the statewide registry
established pursuant to NRS 179B.200 may be inspected pursuant to
chapter 179B of NRS by an officer or employee of the Central
Repository for Nevada Records of Criminal History or a law
enforcement officer in the regular course of his or her duties.
-
*AB160_R3*

– 23 –
6. The State Board of Pardons Commissioners and its agents
and representatives may inquire into and inspect any records sealed
pursuant to NRS 179.245 or 179.255 if the person who is the subject
of the records has applied for a pardon from the Board.
7. As used in this section:
(a) “Information relating to sexual offenses” means information
contained in or concerning a record relating in any way to a sexual
offense.
(b) “Sexual offense” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 179A.073.
Sec. 8. NRS 179.301 is hereby amended to read as follows:
179.301 1. The Nevada Gaming Control Board and the
Nevada Gaming Commission and their employees, agents and
representatives may inquire into and inspect any records sealed
pursuant to NRS 179.245 or 179.255, or section 1.3 of this act, if
the event or conviction was related to gaming, to determine the
suitability or qualifications of any person to hold a state gaming
license, manufacturer’s, seller’s or distributor’s license or
registration as a gaming employee pursuant to chapter 463 of NRS.
Events and convictions, if any, which are the subject of an order
sealing records:
(a) May form the basis for recommendation, denial or
revocation of those licenses.
(b) Must not form the basis for denial or rejection of a gaming
work permit unless the event or conviction relates to the applicant’s
suitability or qualifications to hold the work permit.
2. The Division of Insurance of the Department of Business
and Industry and its employees may inquire into and inspect any
records sealed pursuant to NRS 179.245 or 179.255, or section 1.3
of this act, if the event or conviction was related to insurance, to
determine the suitability or qualifications of any person to hold a
license, certification or authorization issued in accordance with title
57 of NRS. Events and convictions, if any, which are the subject of
an order sealing records may form the basis for recommendation,
denial or revocation of those licenses, certifications and
authorizations.
3. A prosecuting attorney may inquire into and inspect any
records sealed pursuant to NRS 179.245 or 179.255 or section 1.3
of this act if:
(a) The records relate to a violation or alleged violation of NRS
202.485; and
(b) The person who is the subject of the records has been
arrested or issued a citation for violating NRS 202.485.
4. The Central Repository for Nevada Records of Criminal
History and its employees may inquire into and inspect any records
-
*AB160_R3*

– 24 –
sealed pursuant to NRS 179.245 or 179.255 or section 1.3 of this
act that constitute information relating to:
(a) Sexual offenses, and may notify employers of the
information in accordance with federal laws and regulations.
(b) A violation or alleged violation of NRS 202.360.
5. Records which have been sealed pursuant to NRS 179.245
or 179.255 or section 1.3 of this act and which are retained in the
statewide registry established pursuant to NRS 179B.200 may be
inspected pursuant to chapter 179B of NRS by an officer or
employee of the Central Repository for Nevada Records of Criminal
History or a law enforcement officer in the regular course of his or
her duties.
6. The State Board of Pardons Commissioners and its agents
and representatives may inquire into and inspect any records sealed
pursuant to NRS 179.245 or 179.255 or section 1.3 of this act if the
person who is the subject of the records has applied for a pardon
from the Board.
7. As used in this section:
(a) “Information relating to sexual offenses” means information
contained in or concerning a record relating in any way to a sexual
offense.
(b) “Sexual offense” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 179A.073.
Sec. 8.1. There is hereby appropriated from the State General
Fund to the Department of Public Safety the sum of $1,000,000 for
the technology costs associated with complying with the provisions
of section 1.3 of this act.
Sec. 8.15. There is hereby appropriated from the State General
Fund to the Department of Public Safety the sum of $500,000 for
the provision of support to the Advisory Task Force on Automatic
Record Sealing pursuant to section 1.7 of this act, including, without
limitation, for the administrative costs of supporting the Task Force.
Sec. 8.2. There is hereby appropriated from the State General
Fund to the Interim Finance Committee the sum of $1,000,000 for
allocation to the Department of Public Safety for employing or
contracting with persons to perform the functions described in
paragraph (a) of subsection 6 of section 1.7 of this act. To the extent
that money appropriated pursuant to this section is available, the
Department may award grants of money to criminal justice agencies
to support technology or system upgrades for the purpose of
complying with the provisions of section 1.3 of this act.
Sec. 8.25. Any remaining balance of the appropriations made
by sections 8.1, 8.15 and 8.2 of this act must not be committed for
expenditure after June 30, 2025, by the entity to which the
appropriation is made or any entity to which money from the
-
*AB160_R3*

– 25 –
appropriation is granted or otherwise transferred in any manner, and
any portion of the appropriated money remaining must not be spent
for any purpose after September 19, 2025, by either the entity to
which the money was appropriated or the entity to which the money
was subsequently granted or transferred, and must be reverted to the
State General Fund on or before September 19, 2025.
Sec. 8.3. 1. Before January 1, 2025, the Administrative
Office of the Courts shall adopt rules to streamline the process for
filing a petition for the sealing of records of criminal history, as
recommended by the Advisory Task Force on Automatic Record
Sealing pursuant to section 1.7 of this act, including, without
limitation, rules regarding:
(a) A standard order for the sealing of records of criminal
history to be used by all courts having jurisdiction over the sealing
of records of criminal history;
(b) The authority for a petitioner to file a request for the sealing
of records of criminal history with one court; and
(c) Any other changes that will expedite or simplify the process
for petitioners to seal records of criminal history.
2. As used in this section, “record of criminal history” has the
meaning ascribed to it in NRS 179A.070.
Sec. 8.7. The provisions of subsection 1 of NRS 218D.380 do
not apply to any provision of this act which adds or revises a
requirement to submit a report to the Legislature.
Sec. 9. 1. This section and sections 1, 2, 3, 4, 6, 7.5, 8.3 and
8.7 of this act become effective upon passage and approval.
2. Sections 8.1 to 8.25, inclusive, of this act become effective
on July 1, 2023.
3. Section 1.3 of this act becomes effective:
(a) Upon passage and approval for the purpose of:
(1) The Division developing and implementing the process
required pursuant to subsection 1 of that section;
(2) The Administrative Office of the Courts developing and
implementing the process required pursuant to subsection 3 of that
section; and
(3) The Division and the Administrative Office of the Courts
adopting any rules or regulations, as applicable, and performing any
other preparatory administrative tasks that are necessary to carry out
the provisions of this act; and
(b) On January 1, 2027, for all other purposes.
4. Section 1.7 of this act becomes effective upon passage and
approval and expires by limitation on June 30, 2027.
5. Sections 3.5, 3.7, 3.9, 5, 6.5, 7 and 8 of this act become
effective on January 1, 2027.
-
*AB160_R3*

– 26 –
6. Sections 2.3 and 3.1 of this act become effective on
January 1, 2027, and expire by limitation on June 30, 2027.
7. Sections 2.7 and 3.3 of this act become effective on July 1,
2027.
8. As used in this section, “Division” means the Records,
Communications and Compliance Division of the Department of
Public Safety.
H
-
*AB160_R3*